praksid/praks5/sofia-kodutöö5/sofia_jätkud.lexc
LEXICON tüüp_õde
  +Sg+Nom: # ;
      :%{NA%} sg_gen_jt ; 
  +Sg+Part: # ;             
      +Pl:%>de semkäänded ; 
  +Pl+Part:%>sid # ;

LEXICON tüüp_paar
  +Sg+Nom: # ;
         :%>i sg_gen_es ; 
  +Sg+Part:%>i # ;             
      +Pl:%>i # ; 
  +Pl+Part:%>i # ;
  
LEXICON tüüp_kuus
  +Sg+Nom:%>s # ;
         :%>e sg_gen_es ; 
  +Sg+Part:%>t # ;             
      +Pl:%>e # ; 
  +Pl+Part:%>e # ;
  
LEXICON tüüp_vend
  +Sg+Nom:%>d # ;
         :%>na sg_gen_jt ; 
  +Sg+Part:%>da # ;             
      +Pl:%>dade semkäänded ; 
  +Pl+Part:%>dasid # ;

LEXICON tüüp_kümmend
  +Sg+Nom:%>end # ;
         :%>ne sg_gen_jt ; 
  +Sg+Part:%>et # ;             
      +Pl:%>nete semkäänded ; 
  +Pl+Part:%>neid # ;

LEXICON tüüp_sada
  +Sg+Nom:%>da # ;
         :%>ja sg_gen_jt ; 
  +Sg+Part:%>dat # ;             
      +Pl:%>dade semkäänded ; 
  +Pl+Part:%>du # ;

LEXICON sg_gen_jt
        +Sg+Gen: # ;
            +Sg: semkäänded ;
        +Pl+Nom:%>d # ;

LEXICON sg_gen_es
        +Sg+Gen: # ;
            +Sg: # ;
        +Pl+Nom: # ;

LEXICON semkäänded

    +Ill:%>sse # ;
    +Ine:%>s # ;
    +Ela:%>st # ;
    +All:%>le # ;
    +Ade:%>l # ;
    +Abl:%>lt # ;
    +Tra:%>ks # ;
    +Ter:%>ni # ;
    +Ess:%>na # ;
    +Abe:%>ta # ;
    +Kom:%>ga # ;
